Illinois, session 104th, HB3910.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The sum of $720,000 or so much thereof as may be 6necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 7the Deaf and Hard of Hearing Commission for operational 8expenses of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 9    Section 5. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, is appropriated from the Interpreters for the 11Deaf Fund to the Deaf and Hard of Hearing Commission for 12administration and enforcement of the Interpreter for the Deaf 13Licensure Act of 2007. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 152025.